FOOTNOTES


    1 "What," says Archdeacon Wilberforce, "is the natural root of loyalty
      as distinguished from such mere selfish desire of personal security
      as is apt to take its place in civilized times, but that
      consciousness of a natural bond among the families of men which
      gives a fellow-feeling to whole clans and nations, and thus enlists
      their affections in behalf of those time-honoured representatives of
      their ancient blood, in whose success they feel a personal interest?
      Hence the delight when we recognize an act of nobility or justice in
      our hereditary princes

        "'Tuque prior, tu parce genus qui ducis Olympo,
        Projice tela manu _sanguis meus_'

      "So strong is this feeling, that it regains an engrafted influence
      even when history witnesses that vast convulsions have rent and
      weakened it and the Celtic feeling towards the Stuarts has been
      rekindled in our own days towards the grand daughter of George the
      Third of Hanover.

      "Somewhat similar may be seen in the disposition to idolize those
      great lawgivers of man's race, who have given expression, in the
      immortal language of song, to the deeper inspirations of our nature.
      The thoughts of Homer or of Shakespere are the universal inheritance
      of the human race. In this mutual ground every man meets his
      brother, they have been bet forth by the providence of God to
      vindicate for all of us what nature could effect, and that, in these
      representatives of our race, we might recognize our common
      benefactors.'--_Doctrine of the Incarnation,_ pp. 9, 10.

    2 Eikos de min aen kai mnaemoruna panton grapherthai. Vit. Hom. in
      Schweigh Herodot t. iv. p. 299, sq. Section 6. I may observe that
      this Life has been paraphrased in English by my learned young friend
      Kenneth R. H. Mackenzie, and appended to my prose translation of the
      Odyssey. The present abridgement however, will contain all that is
      of use to the reader, for the biographical value of the treatise is
      most insignificant.

    3 --_I.e._ both of composing and reciting verses for as Blair observes,
      "The first poets sang their own verses." Sextus Empir. adv. Mus. p.
      360 ed. Fabric. Ou hamelei ge toi kai oi poiaetai melopoioi
      legontai, kai ta Omaerou epae to palai pros lyran aedeto.

      "The voice," observes Heeren, "was always accompanied by some
      instrument. The bard was provided with a harp on which he played a
      prelude, to elevate and inspire his mind, and with which he
      accompanied the song when begun. His voice probably preserved a
      medium between singing and recitation; the words, and not the melody
      were regarded by the listeners, hence it was necessary for him to
      remain intelligible to all. In countries where nothing similar is
      found, it is difficult to represent such scenes to the mind; but
      whoever has had an opportunity of listening to the improvisation of
      Italy, can easily form an idea of Demodocus and Phemius."--_Ancient
      Greece,_ p. 94.

    4 "Should it not be, since _my_ arrival? asks Mackenzie, observing
      that "poplars can hardly live so long".  But setting aside the fact
      that we must not expect consistency in a mere romance, the ancients
      had a superstitious belief in the great age of trees which grew near
      places consecrated by the presence of gods and great men. See Cicero
      de Legg II I, sub init., where he speaks of the plane tree under
      which Socrates used to walk and of the tree at Delos, where Latona
      gave birth to Apollo. This passage is referred to by Stephanus of
      Byzantium, _s. v._ N. T. p. 490, ed. de Pinedo. I omit quoting any
      of the dull epigrams ascribed to Homer for, as Mr. Justice Talfourd
      rightly observes, "The authenticity of these fragments depends upon
      that of the pseudo Herodotean Life of Homer, from which they are
      taken." Lit of Greece, pp. 38 in Encycl. Metrop. Cf. Coleridge,
      Classic Poets, p. 317.

    5 It is quoted as the work of Cleobulus, by Diogenes Laert. Vit.
      Cleob. p. 62, ed. Casaub.

    6 I trust I am justified in employing this as an equivalent for the
      Greek leschai.

    7 Os ei tous, Homerous doxei trephein autois, omilon pollon te kai
      achreoin exousin. enteuthen de kai tounoma Homeros epekrataese to
      Melaesigenei apo taes symphoraes oi gar Kumaioi tous tuphlous
      Homerous legousin. Vit. Hom. _l. c._ p. 311. The etymology has been
      condemned by recent scholars. See Welcker, Epische Cyclus, p. 127,
      and Mackenzie's note, p. xiv.

    8 Thestorides, thnetoisin anoiston poleon per, ouden aphrastoteron
      peletai noou anthropoisin. Ibid. p. 315. During his stay at Phocoea,
      Homer is said to have composed the Little Iliad, and the Phocoeid.
      See Muller's Hist. of Lit., vi. Section 3. Welcker, _l. c._ pp. 132,
      272, 358, sqq., and Mure, Gr. Lit. vol. ii. p. 284, sq.

    9 This is so pretty a picture of early manners and hospitality, that
      it is almost a pity to find that it is obviously a copy from the
      Odyssey. See the fourteenth book. In fact, whoever was the author of
      this fictitious biography, he showed some tact in identifying Homer
      with certain events described in his poems, and in eliciting from
      them the germs of something like a personal narrative.

   10 Dia logon estionto. A common metaphor. So Plato calls the parties
      conversing daitumones, or estiatores. Tim. i. p. 522 A. Cf. Themist.
      Orat. vi. p. 168, and xvi. p. 374, ed. Petav So diaegaemasi sophois
      omou kai terpnois aedio taen Thoinaen tois hestiomenois epoiei,
      Choricius in Fabric. Bibl. Gr. T. viii. P. 851. logois gar estia,
      Athenaeus vii p 275, A

   11 It was at Bolissus, and in the house of this Chian citizen, that
      Homer is said to have written the Batrachomyomachia, or Battle of
      the Frogs and Mice, the Epicichlidia, and some other minor works.

   12 Chandler, Travels,  vol. i. p. 61, referred to in the Voyage
      Pittoresque dans la Grece, vol. i. P. 92, where a view of the spot
      is given of which the author candidly says,-- "Je ne puis repondre
      d'une exactitude scrupuleuse dans la vue generale que j'en donne,
      car etant alle seul pour l'examiner je perdis mon crayon, et je fus
      oblige de m'en fier a ma memoire. Je ne crois cependant pas avoir
      trop a me plaindre d'elle en cette occasion."

   13 A more probable reason for this companionship, and for the character
      of Mentor itself, is given by the allegorists, viz.: the assumption
      of Mentor's form by the guardian deity of the wise Ulysses, Minerva.
      The classical reader may compare Plutarch, Opp. t. ii. p. 880;
      _Xyland._ Heraclid. Pont. Alleg. Hom. p. 531-5, of Gale's Opusc.
      Mythol. Dionys. Halic. de Hom. Poes. c. 15; Apul. de Deo Socrat. s.
      f.

   14 Vit. Hom. Section 28.

   15 The riddle is given in Section 35. Compare Mackenzie's note, p. xxx.

   16 Heeren's Ancient Greece, p. 96.

   17 Compare Sir E. L. Bulwer's Caxtons v. i. p. 4.

   18 Pericles and Aspasia, Letter lxxxiv., Works, vol ii. p. 387.

   19 Quarterly Review, No. lxxxvii., p. 147.

   20 Viz., the following beautiful passage, for the translation of which
      I am indebted to Coleridge, Classic Poets, p. 286.

          "Origias, farewell! and oh! remember me
          Hereafter, when some stranger from the sea,
          A hapless wanderer, may your isle explore,
          And ask you, maid, of all the bards you boast,
          Who sings the sweetest, and delights you most
          Oh! answer all,--'A blind old man and poor
        Sweetest he sings--and dwells on Chios' rocky shore.'"

                                                   _See_ Thucyd. iii, 104.

   21 Longin., de Sublim., ix. Section 26. Othen en tae Odysseia
      pareikasai tis an kataduomeno ton Omaeron haelio, oo dixa taes
      sphodrotaetos paramenei to megethos

   22 See Tatian, quoted in Fabric. Bibl. Gr. v. II t. ii. Mr. Mackenzie
      has given three brief but elaborate papers on the different writers
      on the subject, which deserve to be consulted. See Notes and
      Queries, vol. v. pp. 99, 171, and 221. His own views are moderate,
      and perhaps as satisfactory, on the whole, as any of the hypotheses
      hitherto put forth. In fact, they consist in an attempt to blend
      those hypotheses into something like consistency, rather than in
      advocating any individual theory.

   23 Letters to Phileleuth; Lips.

   24 Hist. of Greece, vol. ii. p. 191, sqq.

   25 It is, indeed not easy to calculate the height to which the memory
      may be cultivated. To take an ordinary case, we might refer to that
      of any first rate actor, who must be prepared, at a very short
      warning, to 'rhapsodize,' night after night, parts which when laid
      together, would amount to an immense number of lines. But all this
      is nothing to two instances of our own day. Visiting at Naples a
      gentleman of the highest intellectual attainments, and who held a
      distinguished rank among the men of letters in the last century, he
      informed us that the day before he had passed much time in examining
      a man, not highly educated, who had learned to repeat the whole
      Gierusalemme of Tasso, not only to recite it consecutively, but also
      to repeat those stanzas in utter defiance of the sense, either
      forwards or backwards, or from the eighth line to the first,
      alternately the odd and even lines--in short, whatever the passage
      required; the memory, which seemed to cling to the words much more
      than to the sense, had it at such perfect command, that it could
      produce it under any form. Our informant went on to state that this
      singular being was proceeding to learn the Orlando Furioso in the
      same manner. But even this instance is less wonderful than one as to
      which we may appeal to any of our readers that happened some twenty
      years ago to visit the town of Stirling, in Scotland. No such person
      can have forgotten the poor, uneducated man Blind Jamie who could
      actually repeat, after a few minutes consideration any verse
      required from any part of the Bible--even the obscurest and most
      unimportant enumeration of mere proper names not excepted. We do not
      mention these facts as touching the more difficult part of the
      question before us, but facts they are; and if we find so much
      difficulty in calculating the extent to which the mere memory may be
      cultivated, are we, in these days of multifarious reading, and of
      countless distracting affairs, fair judges of the perfection to
      which the invention and the memory combined may attain in a simpler
      age, and among a more single minded people?--Quarterly Review, _l.
      c.,_ p. 143, sqq.

      Heeren steers between the two opinions, observing that, "The
      Dschungariade of the Calmucks is said to surpass the poems of Homer
      in length, as much as it stands beneath them in merit, and yet it
      exists only in the memory of a people which is not unacquainted with
      writing. But the songs of a nation are probably the last things
      which are committed to writing, for the very reason that they are
      remembered."-- _Ancient Greece._ p. 100.

   26 Vol. II p. 198, sqq.

   27 Quarterly Review, _l. c.,_ p. 131 sq.

   28 Betrachtungen uber die Ilias. Berol. 1841. See Grote, p. 204. Notes
      and Queries, vol. v. p. 221.

   29 Prolegg. pp. xxxii., xxxvi., &c.

   30 Vol. ii. p. 214 sqq.

   31 "Who," says Cicero, de Orat. iii. 34, "was more learned in that age,
      or whose eloquence is reported to have been more perfected by
      literature than that of Peisistratus, who is said first to have
      disposed the books of Homer in the order in which we now have them?"
      Compare Wolf's Prolegomena, Section 33

   32 "The first book, together with the eighth, and the books from the
      eleventh to the twenty-second inclusive, seems to form the primary
      organization of the poem, then properly an Achilleis."--Grote, vol.
      ii. p. 235

   33 K. R. H. Mackenzie, Notes and Queries, p. 222 sqq.

   34 See his Epistle to Raphelingius, in Schroeder's edition, 4to.,
      Delphis, 1728.

   35 Ancient Greece, p. 101.

   36 The best description of this monument will be found in Vaux's
      "Antiquities of the British Museum," p. 198 sq. The monument itself
      (Towneley Sculptures, No. 123) is well known.

   37 Coleridge, Classic Poets, p. 276.

   38 Preface to her Homer.

   39 Hesiod. Opp. et Dier. Lib. I. vers. 155, &c.

   40 The following argument of the Iliad, corrected in a few particulars,
      is translated from Bitaube, and is, perhaps, the neatest summary
      that has ever been drawn up:--"A hero, injured by his general, and
      animated with a noble resentment, retires to his tent; and for a
      season withdraws himself and his troops from the war. During this
      interval, victory abandons the army, which for nine years has been
      occupied in a great enterprise, upon the successful termination of
      which the honour of their country depends. The general, at length
      opening his eyes to the fault which he had committed, deputes the
      principal officers of his army to the incensed hero, with commission
      to make compensation for the injury, and to tender magnificent
      presents. The hero, according to the proud obstinacy of his
      character, persists in his animosity; the army is again defeated,
      and is on the verge of entire destruction. This inexorable man has a
      friend; this friend weeps before him, and asks for the hero's arms,
      and for permission to go to the war in his stead. The eloquence of
      friendship prevails more than the intercession of the ambassadors or
      the gifts of the general. He lends his armour to his friend, but
      commands him not to engage with the chief of the enemy's army,
      because he reserves to himself the honour of that combat, and
      because he also fears for his friend's life. The prohibition is
      forgotten; the friend listens to nothing but his courage; his corpse
      is brought back to the hero, and the hero's arms become the prize of
      the conqueror. Then the hero, given up to the most lively despair,
      prepares to fight; he receives from a divinity new armour, is
      reconciled with his general and, thirsting for glory and revenge,
      enacts prodigies of valour, recovers the victory, slays the enemy's
      chief, honours his friend with superb funeral rites, and exercises a
      cruel vengeance on the body of his destroyer; but finally appeased
      by the tears and prayers of the father of the slain warrior,
      restores to the old man the corpse of his son, which he buries with
      due solemnities.'--Coleridge, p. 177, sqq.

   41 Vultures: Pope is more accurate than the poet he translates, for
      Homer writes "a prey to dogs and to _all_ kinds of birds. But all
      kinds of birds are not carnivorous.

   42 --_i.e._ during the whole time of their striving the will of Jove was
      being gradually accomplished.

   43 Compare Milton's "Paradise Lost" i. 6

        "Sing, heavenly Muse, that on the secret top
        Of Horeb, or of Sinai, didst inspire
        That shepherd."

   44 --_Latona's son: i.e._ Apollo.

   45 --_King of men:_ Agamemnon.

   46 --_Brother kings:_ Menelaus and Agamemnon.

   47 --_Smintheus_ an epithet taken from sminthos, the Phrygian name for a
      _mouse,_ was applied to Apollo for having put an end to a plague of
      mice which had harassed that territory. Strabo, however, says, that
      when the Teucri were migrating from Crete, they were told by an
      oracle to settle in that place, where they should not be attacked by
      the original inhabitants of the land, and that, having halted for
      the night, a number of field-mice came and gnawed away the leathern
      straps of their baggage, and thongs of their armour. In fulfilment
      of the oracle, they settled on the spot, and raised a temple to
      Sminthean Apollo. Grote, "History of Greece," i. p. 68, remarks that
      the "worship of Sminthean Apollo, in various parts of the Troad and
      its neighboring territory, dates before the earliest period of
      Aeolian colonization."

   48 --_Cilla,_ a town of Troas near Thebe, so called from Cillus, a
      sister of Hippodamia, slain by OEnomaus.

   49 A mistake. It should be,


          "If e'er I _roofed_ thy graceful fane,"


      for the custom of decorating temples with garlands was of later
      date.

   50 --_Bent was his bow_ "The Apollo of Homer, it must be borne in mind,
      is a different character from the deity of the same name in the
      later classical pantheon. Throughout both poems, all deaths from
      unforeseen or invisible causes, the ravages of pestilence, the fate
      of the young child or promising adult, cut off in the germ of
      infancy or flower of youth, of the old man dropping peacefully into
      the grave, or of the reckless sinner suddenly checked in his career
      of crime, are ascribed to the arrows of Apollo or Diana. The
      oracular functions of the god rose naturally out of the above
      fundamental attributes, for who could more appropriately impart to
      mortals what little foreknowledge Fate permitted of her decrees than
      the agent of her most awful dispensations? The close union of the
      arts of prophecy and song explains his additional office of god of
      music, while the arrows with which he and his sister were armed,
      symbols of sudden death in every age, no less naturally procured him
      that of god of archery. Of any connection between Apollo and the
      Sun, whatever may have existed in the more esoteric doctrine of the
      Greek sanctuaries, there is no trace in either Iliad or
      Odyssey."--Mure, "History of Greek Literature," vol. i. p. 478, sq.

   51 It has frequently been observed, that most pestilences begin with
      animals, and that Homer had this fact in mind.

   52 --_Convened to council._ The public assembly in the heroic times is
      well characterized by Grote, vol. ii. p 92. "It is an assembly for
      talk. Communication and discussion to a certain extent by the chiefs
      in person, of the people as listeners and sympathizers--often for
      eloquence, and sometimes for quarrel--but here its ostensible
      purposes end."

   53 Old Jacob Duport, whose "Gnomologia Homerica" is full of curious and
      useful things, quotes several passages of the ancients, in which
      reference is made to these words of Homer, in maintenance of the
      belief that dreams had a divine origin and an import in which men
      were interested.

   54 Rather, "bright-eyed." See the German critics quoted by Arnold.

   55 The prize given to Ajax was Tecmessa, while Ulysses received
      Laodice, the daughter of Cycnus.

   56 The Myrmidons dwelt on the southern borders of Thessaly, and took
      their origin from Myrmido, son of Jupiter and Eurymedusa. It is
      fancifully supposed that the name was derived from myrmaex, an
      _ant,_ "because they imitated the diligence of the ants, and like
      them were indefatigable, continually employed in cultivating the
      earth; the change from ants to men is founded merely on the
      equivocation of their name, which resembles that of the ant: they
      bore a further resemblance to these little animals, in that instead
      of inhabiting towns or villages, at first they commonly resided in
      the open fields, having no other retreats but dens and the cavities
      of trees, until Ithacus brought them together, and settled them in
      more secure and comfortable habitations."--Anthon's "Lempriere."

   57 Eustathius, after Heraclides Ponticus and others, allegorizes this
      apparition, as if the appearance of Minerva to Achilles, unseen by
      the rest, was intended to point out the sudden recollection that he
      would gain nothing by intemperate wrath, and that it were best to
      restrain his anger, and only gratify it by withdrawing his services.
      The same idea is rather cleverly worked out by Apuleius, "De Deo
      Socratis."

   58 Compare Milton, "Paradise Lost," bk. ii:

          "Though his tongue
        Dropp'd manna."

      So Proverbs v. 3, "For the lips of a strange woman drop as an
      honey-comb."

   59 Salt water was chiefly used in lustrations, from its being supposed
      to possess certain fiery particles. Hence, if sea-water could not be
      obtained, salt was thrown into the fresh water to be used for the
      lustration. Menander, in Clem. Alex. vii. p.713, hydati perriranai,
      embalon alas, phakois.

   60 The persons of heralds were held inviolable, and they were at
      liberty to travel whither they would without fear of molestation.
      Pollux, Onom. viii. p. 159. The office was generally given to old
      men, and they were believed to be under the especial protection of
      Jove and Mercury.

   61 His mother, Thetis, the daughter of Nereus and Doris, who was
      courted by Neptune and Jupiter. When, however, it was known that the
      son to whom she would give birth must prove greater than his father,
      it was determined to wed her to a mortal, and Peleus, with great
      difficulty, succeeded in obtaining her hand, as she eluded him by
      assuming various forms. Her children were all destroyed by fire
      through her attempts to see whether they were immortal, and Achilles
      would have shared the same fate had not his father rescued him. She
      afterwards rendered him invulnerable by plunging him into the waters
      of the Styx, with the exception of that part of the heel by which
      she held him. Hygin. Fab. 54

   62 Thebe was a city of Mysia, north of Adramyttium.

   63 That is, defrauds me of the prize allotted me by their votes.

   64 Quintus Calaber goes still further in his account of the service
      rendered to Jove by Thetis:

        "Nay more, the fetters of Almighty Jove
        She loosed"--Dyce's "Calaber," s. 58.

   65 --_To Fates averse._ Of the gloomy destiny reigning throughout the
      Homeric poems, and from which even the gods are not exempt, Schlegel
      well observes, "This power extends also to the world of gods-- for
      the Grecian gods are mere powers of nature--and although immeasurably
      higher than mortal man, yet, compared with infinitude, they are on
      an equal footing with himself."--'Lectures on the Drama' v. p. 67.

   66 It has been observed that the annual procession of the sacred ship
      so often represented on Egyptian monuments, and the return of the
      deity from Ethiopia after some days' absence, serves to show the
      Ethiopian origin of Thebes, and of the worship of Jupiter Ammon. "I
      think," says Heeren, after quoting a passage from Diodorus about the
      holy ship, "that this procession is represented in one of the great
      sculptured reliefs on the temple of Karnak. The sacred ship of Ammon
      is on the shore with its whole equipment, and is towed along by
      another boat. It is therefore on its voyage. This must have been one
      of the most celebrated festivals, since, even according to the
      interpretation of antiquity, Homer alludes to it when he speaks of
      Jupiter's visit to the Ethiopians, and his twelve days'
      absence."--Long, "Egyptian Antiquities" vol. 1 p. 96. Eustathius,
      vol. 1 p. 98, sq. (ed. Basil) gives this interpretation, and
      likewise an allegorical one, which we will spare the reader.

   67 --_Atoned,_ i.e. reconciled. This is the proper and most natural
      meaning of the word, as may be seen from Taylor's remarks in
      Calmet's Dictionary, p.110, of my edition.

   68 That is, drawing back their necks while they cut their throats. "If
      the sacrifice was in honour of the celestial gods, the throat was
      bent upwards towards heaven; but if made to the heroes, or infernal
      deities, it was killed with its throat toward the ground."-- "Elgin
      Marbles," vol i. p.81.

        "The jolly crew, unmindful of the past,
        The quarry share, their plenteous dinner haste,
        Some strip the skin; some portion out the spoil;
        The limbs yet trembling, in the caldrons boil;
        Some on the fire the reeking entrails broil.
        Stretch'd on the grassy turf, at ease they dine,
        Restore their strength with meat, and cheer their souls with
                    wine."

                                                Dryden's "Virgil," i. 293.

   69 --_Crown'd, i.e._ filled to the brim. The custom of adorning goblets
      with flowers was of later date.

   70 --_He spoke,_ &c. "When a friend inquired of Phidias what pattern he
      had formed his Olympian Jupiter, he is said to have answered by
      repeating the lines of the first Iliad in which the poet represents
      the majesty of the god in the most sublime terms; thereby signifying
      that the genius of Homer had inspired him with it. Those who beheld
      this statue are said to have been so struck with it as to have asked
      whether Jupiter had descended from heaven to show himself to
      Phidias, or whether Phidias had been carried thither to contemplate
      the god."-- "Elgin Marbles," vol. xii p.124.

           71 "So was his will
          Pronounced among the gods, and by an oath,
          That shook heav'n's whole circumference, confirm'd."

                                                  "Paradise Lost" ii. 351.

   72 --_A double bowl, i.e._ a vessel with a cup at both ends, something
      like the measures by which a halfpenny or pennyworth of nuts is
      sold. See Buttmann, Lexic. p. 93 sq.

   73 "Paradise Lost," i. 44.

          "Him th' Almighty power
        Hurl'd headlong flaming from th ethereal sky,
        With hideous ruin and combustion"

   74 The occasion on which Vulcan incurred Jove's displeasure was
      this--After Hercules, had taken and pillaged Troy, Juno raised a
      storm, which drove him to the island of Cos, having previously cast
      Jove into a sleep, to prevent him aiding his son. Jove, in revenge,
      fastened iron anvils to her feet, and hung her from the sky, and
      Vulcan, attempting to relieve her, was kicked down from Olympus in
      the manner described. The allegorists have gone mad in finding deep
      explanations for this amusing fiction. See Heraclides, 'Ponticus,"
      p. 463 sq., ed Gale. The story is told by Homer himself in Book xv.
      The Sinthians were a race of robbers, the ancient inhabitants of
      Lemnos which island was ever after sacred to Vulcan.

        "Nor was his name unheard or unadored
        In ancient Greece, and in Ausonian land
        Men call'd him Mulciber, and how he fell
        From heaven, they fabled, thrown by angry Jove
        Sheer o'er the crystal battlements from morn
        To noon he fell, from noon to dewy eve,
        A summer's day and with the setting sun
        Dropp'd from the zenith like a falling star
        On Lemnos, th' Aegean isle thus they relate."

                                                   "Paradise Lost," i. 738

   75 It is ingeniously observed by Grote, vol i p. 463, that "The gods
      formed a sort of political community of their own which had its
      hierarchy, its distribution of ranks and duties, its contentions for
      power and occasional revolutions, its public meetings in the agora
      of Olympus, and its multitudinous banquets or festivals."

   76 Plato, Rep. iii. p. 437, was so scandalized at this deception of
      Jupiter's, and at his other attacks on the character of the gods,
      that he would fain sentence him to an honourable banishment. (See
      Minucius Felix, Section 22.) Coleridge, Introd. p. 154, well
      observes, that the supreme father of gods and men had a full right
      to employ a lying spirit to work out his ultimate will. Compare
      "Paradise Lost," v. 646:

          "And roseate dews disposed
        All but the unsleeping eyes of God to rest."

   77 --_Dream_ ought to be spelt with a capital letter, being, I think,
      evidently personified as the god of dreams. See Anthon and others.

        "When, by Minerva sent, a _fraudful_ Dream
        Rush'd from the skies, the bane of her and Troy."

                  Dyce's "Select Translations from Quintus Calaber," p.10.

           78 "Sleep'st thou, companion dear, what sleep can close
        Thy eye-lids?"

                                                 --"Paradise Lost," v. 673.

   79 This truly military sentiment has been echoed by the approving voice
      of many a general and statesman of antiquity. See Pliny's Panegyric
      on Trajan. Silius neatly translates it,


          "Turpe duci totam somno consumere noctem."


   80 --_The same in habit, &c._

        "To whom once more the winged god appears;
        His former youthful mien and shape he wears."

                                                 Dryden's Virgil, iv. 803.

           81 "As bees in spring-time, when
        The sun with Taurus rides,
        Pour forth their populous youth about the hive
        In clusters; they among fresh dews and flowers
        Fly to and fro, or on the smoothed plank,
        The suburb of this straw-built citadel,
        New-nibb'd with balm, expatiate and confer
        Their state affairs. So thick the very crowd
        Swarm'd and were straiten'd."--"Paradise Lost" i. 768.

   82 It was the herald's duty to make the people sit down. "A _standing_
      agora is a symptom of manifest terror (II. Xviii. 246) an evening
      agora, to which men came elevated by wine, is also the forerunner of
      mischief ('Odyssey,' iii. 138)."--Grote, ii. p. 91, _note._

   83 This sceptre, like that of Judah (Genesis xlix. 10), is a type of
      the supreme and far-spread dominion of the house of the Atrides. See
      Thucydides i. 9. "It is traced through the hands of Hermes, he being
      the wealth giving god, whose blessing is most efficacious in
      furthering the process of acquisition."--Grote, i. p. 212. Compare
      Quintus Calaber (Dyce's Selections, p. 43).

          "Thus the monarch spoke,
        Then pledged the chief in a capacious cup,
        Golden, and framed by art divine (a gift
        Which to Almighty Jove lame Vulcan brought
        Upon his nuptial day, when he espoused
        The Queen of Love), the sire of gods bestow'd
        The cup on Dardanus, who gave it next
        To Ericthonius Tros received it then,
        And left it, with his wealth, to be possess'd
        By Ilus he to great Laomedon
        Gave it, and last to Priam's lot it fell."

   84 Grote, i, p. 393, states the number of the Grecian forces at upwards
      of 100,000 men. Nichols makes a total of 135,000.

           85 "As thick as when a field
        Of Ceres, ripe for harvest, waving bends
        His bearded grove of ears, which way the wind
        Sways them."--Paradise Lost," iv. 980, sqq.

   86 This sentiment used to be a popular one with some of the greatest
      tyrants, who abused it into a pretext for unlimited usurpation of
      power. Dion, Caligula, and Domitian were particularly fond of it,
      and, in an extended form, we find the maxim propounded by Creon in
      the Antigone of Sophocles. See some important remarks of Heeren,
      "Ancient Greece," ch. vi. p. 105.

   87 It may be remarked, that the character of Thersites, revolting and
      contemptible as it is, serves admirably to develop the disposition
      of Ulysses in a new light, in which mere cunning is less prominent.
      Of the gradual and individual development of Homer's heroes,
      Schlegel well observes, "In bas-relief the figures are usually in
      profile, and in the epos all are characterized in the simplest
      manner in relief; they are not grouped together, but follow one
      another; so Homer's heroes advance, one by one, in succession before
      us. It has been remarked that the _Iliad_ is not definitively
      closed, but that we are left to suppose something both to precede
      and to follow it. The bas-relief is equally without limit, and may
      be continued _ad infinitum,_ either from before or behind, on which
      account the ancients preferred for it such subjects as admitted of
      an indefinite extension, sacrificial processions, dances, and lines
      of combatants, and hence they also exhibit bas-reliefs on curved
      surfaces, such as vases, or the frieze of a rotunda, where, by the
      curvature, the two ends are withdrawn from our sight, and where,
      while we advance, one object appears as another disappears. Reading
      Homer is very much like such a circuit; the present object alone
      arresting our attention, we lose sight of what precedes, and do not
      concern ourselves about what is to follow."--"Dramatic Literature,"
      p. 75.

   88 "There cannot be a clearer indication than this description --so
      graphic in the original poem--of the true character of the Homeric
      agora. The multitude who compose it are listening and acquiescent,
      not often hesitating, and never refractory to the chief. The fate
      which awaits a presumptuous critic, even where his virulent
      reproaches are substantially well-founded, is plainly set forth in
      the treatment of Thersites; while the unpopularity of such a
      character is attested even more by the excessive pains which Homer
      takes to heap upon him repulsive personal deformities, than by the
      chastisement of Odysseus he is lame, bald, crook-backed, of
      misshapen head, and squinting vision."--Grote, vol. i. p. 97.

   89 According to Pausanias, both the sprig and the remains of the tree
      were exhibited in his time. The tragedians, Lucretius and others,
      adopted a different fable to account for the stoppage at Aulis, and
      seem to have found the sacrifice of Iphigena better suited to form
      the subject of a tragedy. Compare Dryden's "Ćneid," vol. iii. sqq.

   90 --_Full of his god, i.e.,_ Apollo, filled with the prophetic spirit.
      "_The_ god" would be more simple and emphatic.

   91 Those critics who have maintained that the "Catalogue of Ships" is
      an interpolation, should have paid more attention to these lines,
      which form a most natural introduction to their enumeration.

   92 The following observation will be useful to Homeric readers:
      "Particular animals were, at a later time, consecrated to particular
      deities. To Jupiter, Ceres, Juno, Apollo, and Bacchus victims of
      advanced age might be offered. An ox of five years old was
      considered especially acceptable to Jupiter. A black bull, a ram, or
      a boar pig, were offerings for Neptune. A heifer, or a sheep, for
      Minerva. To Ceres a sow was sacrificed, as an enemy to corn. The
      goat to Bacchus, because he fed on vines. Diana was propitiated with
      a stag; and to Venus the dove was consecrated. The infernal and evil
      deities were to be appeased with black victims. The most acceptable
      of all sacrifices was the heifer of a year old, which had never
      borne the yoke. It was to be perfect in every limb, healthy, and
      without blemish."--"Elgin Marbles," vol. i. p. 78.

   93 --_Idomeneus,_ son of Deucalion, was king of Crete. Having vowed,
      during a tempest, on his return from Troy, to sacrifice to Neptune
      the first creature that should present itself to his eye on the
      Cretan shore, his son fell a victim to his rash vow.

   94 --_Tydeus' son, i.e._ Diomed.

   95 That is, Ajax, the son of Oileus, a Locrian. He must be
      distinguished from the other, who was king of Salamis.

   96 A great deal of nonsense has been written to account for the word
      _unbid,_ in this line. Even Plato, "Sympos." p. 315, has found some
      curious meaning in what, to us, appears to need no explanation. Was
      there any _heroic_ rule of etiquette which prevented one
      brother-king visiting another without a formal invitation?

   97 Fresh water fowl, especially swans, were found in great numbers
      about the Asian Marsh, a fenny tract of country in Lydia, formed by
      the river Cayster, near its mouth. See Virgil, "Georgics," vol. i.
      383, sq.

   98 --_Scamander,_ or Scamandros, was a river of Troas, rising, according
      to Strabo, on the highest part of Mount Ida, in the same hill with
      the Granicus and the OEdipus, and falling into the sea at Sigaeum;
      everything tends to identify it with Mendere, as Wood, Rennell, and
      others maintain; the Mendere is 40 miles long, 300 feet broad, deep
      in the time of flood, nearly dry in the summer. Dr. Clarke
      successfully combats the opinion of those who make the Scamander to
      have arisen from the springs of Bounabarshy, and traces the source
      of the river to the highest mountain in the chain of Ida, now
      Kusdaghy; receives the Simois in its course; towards its mouth it is
      very muddy, and flows through marshes. Between the Scamander and
      Simois, Homer's Troy is supposed to have stood: this river,
      according to Homer, was called Xanthus by the gods, Scamander by
      men. The waters of the Scamander had the singular property of giving
      a beautiful colour to the hair or wool of such animals as bathed in
      them; hence the three goddesses, Minerva, Juno, and Venus, bathed
      there before they appeared before Paris to obtain the golden apple:
      the name Xanthus, "yellow," was given to the Scamander, from the
      peculiar colour of its waters, still applicable to the Mendere, the
      yellow colour of whose waters attracts the attention of travellers.

   99 It should be "his _chest_ like Neptune." The torso of Neptune, in
      the "Elgin Marbles," No. 103, (vol. ii. p. 26,) is remarkable for
      its breadth and massiveness of development.

          100 "Say first, for heav'n hides nothing from thy view."

                                                  --"Paradise Lost," i. 27.

        "Ma di' tu, Musa, come i primi danni
        Mandassero a Cristiani, e di quai parti:
        Tu 'l sai; ma di tant' opra a noi si lunge
        Debil aura di fama appena giunge."

                                                     --"Gier. Lib." iv. 19.

  101 "The Catalogue is, perhaps, the portion of the poem in favour of
      which a claim to separate authorship has been most plausibly urged.
      Although the example of Homer has since rendered some such formal
      enumeration of the forces engaged, a common practice in epic poems
      descriptive of great warlike adventures, still so minute a
      statistical detail can neither be considered as imperatively
      required, nor perhaps such as would, in ordinary cases, suggest
      itself to the mind of a poet. Yet there is scarcely any portion of
      the Iliad where both historical and internal evidence are more
      clearly in favour of a connection from the remotest period, with the
      remainder of the work. The composition of the Catalogue, whensoever
      it may have taken place, necessarily presumes its author's
      acquaintance with a previously existing Iliad. It were impossible
      otherwise to account for the harmony observable in the recurrence of
      so vast a number of proper names, most of them historically
      unimportant, and not a few altogether fictitious: or of so many
      geographical and genealogical details as are condensed in these few
      hundred lines, and incidentally scattered over the thousands which
      follow: equally inexplicable were the pointed allusions occurring in
      this episode to events narrated in the previous and subsequent text,
      several of which could hardly be of traditional notoriety, but
      through the medium of the Iliad."--Mure, "Language and Literature of
      Greece," vol. i. p. 263.

  102 --_Twice Sixty:_ "Thucydides observes that the Boeotian vessels,
      which carried one hundred and twenty men each, were probably meant
      to be the largest in the fleet, and those of Philoctetes, carrying
      fifty each, the smallest. The average would be eighty-five, and
      Thucydides supposes the troops to have rowed and navigated
      themselves; and that very few, besides the chiefs, went as mere
      passengers or landsmen. In short, we have in the Homeric
      descriptions the complete picture of an Indian or African war canoe,
      many of which are considerably larger than the largest scale
      assigned to those of the Greeks. If the total number of the Greek
      ships be taken at twelve hundred, according to Thucydides, although
      in point of fact there are only eleven hundred and eighty-six in the
      Catalogue, the amount of the army, upon the foregoing average, will
      be about a hundred and two thousand men. The historian considers
      this a small force as representing all Greece. Bryant, comparing it
      with the allied army at Platae, thinks it so large as to prove the
      entire falsehood of the whole story; and his reasonings and
      calculations are, for their curiosity, well worth a careful
      perusal."--Coleridge, p. 211, sq.

  103 The mention of Corinth is an anachronism, as that city was called
      Ephyre before its capture by the Dorians. But Velleius, vol. i. p.
      3, well observes, that the poet would naturally speak of various
      towns and cities by the names by which they were known in his own
      time.

          104 "Adam, the goodliest man of men since born,
        His sons, the fairest of her daughters Eve.'

                                                --"Paradise Lost," iv. 323.

  105 --_Ćsetes' tomb._ Monuments were often built on the sea-coast, and of
      a considerable height, so as to serve as watch-towers or land marks.
      See my notes to my prose translations of the "Odyssey," ii. p. 21,
      or on Eur. "Alcest." vol. i. p. 240.

  106 --_Zeleia,_ another name for Lycia. The inhabitants were greatly
      devoted to the worship of Apollo. See Muller, "Dorians," vol. i. p.
      248.

  107 --_Barbarous tongues._ "Various as were the dialects of the
      Greeks--and these differences existed not only between the several
      tribes, but even between neighbouring cities--they yet acknowledged
      in their language that they formed but one nation were but branches
      of the same family. Homer has 'men of other tongues:' and yet Homer
      had no general name for the Greek nation."--Heeren, "Ancient Greece,"
      Section vii. p. 107, sq.

        _  108 The cranes._
        "Marking the tracts of air, the clamorous cranes
        Wheel their due flight in varied ranks descried:
        And each with outstretch'd neck his rank maintains,
        In marshall'd order through th' ethereal void."

                            Lorenzo de Medici, in Roscoe's Life, Appendix.

      See Cary's Dante: "Hell," canto v.

        _  109 Silent, breathing rage._
          "Thus they,
        Breathing united force with fixed thought,
        Moved on in silence."

                                             "Paradise Lost," book i. 559.

          110 "As when some peasant in a bushy brake
        Has with unwary footing press'd a snake;
        He starts aside, astonish'd, when he spies
        His rising crest, blue neck, and rolling eyes"

                                                 Dryden's Virgil, ii. 510.

  111 Dysparis, i.e. unlucky, ill fated, Paris. This alludes to the evils
      which resulted from his having been brought up, despite the omens
      which attended his birth.

  112 The following scene, in which Homer has contrived to introduce so
      brilliant a sketch of the Grecian warriors, has been imitated by
      Euripides, who in his "Phoenissae" represents Antigone surveying the
      opposing champions from a high tower, while the paedagogus describes
      their insignia and details their histories.

  113 --_No wonder,_ &c. Zeuxis, the celebrated artist, is said to have
      appended these lines to his picture of Helen, as a motto. Valer Max.
      iii. 7.

  114 The early epic was largely occupied with the exploits and sufferings
      of women, or heroines, the wives and daughters of the Grecian
      heroes. A nation of courageous, hardy, indefatigable women, dwelling
      apart from men, permitting only a short temporary intercourse, for
      the purpose of renovating their numbers, burning out their right
      breast with a view of enabling themselves to draw the bow freely;
      this was at once a general type, stimulating to the fancy of the
      poet, and a theme eminently popular with his hearers. We find these
      warlike females constantly reappearing in the ancient poems, and
      universally accepted as past realities in the Iliad. When Priam
      wishes to illustrate emphatically the most numerous host in which he
      ever found himself included, he tells us that it was assembled in
      Phrygia, on the banks of the Sangarius, for the purpose of resisting
      the formidable Amazons. When Bellerophon is to be employed in a
      deadly and perilous undertaking, by those who prudently wished to
      procure his death, he is despatched against the Amazons.--Grote, vol.
      i p. 289.

  115 --_Antenor,_ like Ćneas, had always been favourable to the
      restoration of Helen. Liv 1. 2.

          116 "His lab'ring heart with sudden rapture seized
        He paus'd, and on the ground in silence gazed.
        Unskill'd and uninspired he seems to stand,
        Nor lifts the eye, nor graceful moves the hand:
        Then, while the chiefs in still attention hung,
        Pours the full tide of eloquence along;
        While from his lips the melting torrent flows,
        Soft as the fleeces of descending snows.
        Now stronger notes engage the listening crowd,
        Louder the accents rise, and yet more loud,
        Like thunders rolling from a distant cloud."

                                        Merrick's "Tryphiodorus," 148, 99.

  117 Duport, "Gnomol. Homer," p. 20, well observes that this comparison
      may also be sarcastically applied to the _frigid_ style of oratory.
      It, of course, here merely denotes the ready fluency of Ulysses.

  118 --_Her brothers' doom._ They perished in combat with Lynceus and
      Idas, whilst besieging Sparta. See Hygin. Poet Astr. 32, 22. Virgil
      and others, however, make them share immortality by turns.

  119 Idreus was the arm-bearer and charioteer of king Priam, slain during
      this war. Cf. Ćn, vi. 487.

  120 --_Scaea's gates,_ rather _Scaean gates,_ _i.e._ the left-hand gates.

  121 This was customary in all sacrifices. Hence we find Iras descending
      to cut off the hair of Dido, before which she could not expire.

  122 --_Nor pierced._

        "This said, his feeble hand a jav'lin threw,
        Which, flutt'ring, seemed to loiter as it flew,
        Just, and but barely, to the mark it held,
        And faintly tinkled on the brazen shield."

                                                 Dryden's Virgil, ii. 742.

_  123 Reveal'd the queen._

        "Thus having said, she turn'd and made appear
        Her neck refulgent and dishevell'd hair,
        Which, flowing from her shoulders, reach'd the ground,
        And widely spread ambrosial scents around.
        In length of train descends her sweeping gown;
        And, by her graceful walk, the queen of love is known."

                                                  Dryden's Virgil, i. 556.

  124 --_Cranae's isle, i.e._ Athens. See the "Schol." and Alberti's
      "Hesychius," vol. ii. p. 338. This name was derived from one of its
      early kings, Cranaus.

  125 --_The martial maid._ In the original, "Minerva Alalcomeneis," _i.e.
      the defender,_ so called from her temple at Alalcomene in Boeotia.

  126 "Anything for a quiet life!"

  127 --_Argos._ The worship of Juno at Argos was very celebrated in
      ancient times, and she was regarded as the patron deity of that
      city. Apul. Met., vi. p. 453; Servius on Virg. Ćn., i. 28.

  128 --_A wife and sister._

        "But I, who walk in awful state above
        The majesty of heav'n, the sister-wife of Jove."

                                                 Dryden's "Virgil," i. 70.

      So Apuleius, _l. c._ speaks of her as "Jovis germana et conjux, and
      so Horace, Od. iii. 3, 64, "conjuge me Jovis et sorore."

          129 "Thither came Uriel, gleaming through the even
        On a sunbeam, swift as a shooting star
        In autumn thwarts the night, when vapours fired
        Impress the air, and shows the mariner
        From what point of his compass to beware
        Impetuous winds."

                                                --"Paradise Lost," iv. 555.

  130 --_Ćsepus' flood._ A river of Mysia, rising from Mount Cotyius, in
      the southern part of the chain of Ida.

  131 --_Zelia,_ a town of Troas, at the foot of Ida.

  132 --_Podaleirius_ and _Machaon_ are the leeches of the Grecian army,
      highly prized and consulted by all the wounded chiefs. Their medical
      renown was further prolonged in the subsequent poem of Arktinus, the
      Iliou Persis, wherein the one was represented as unrivalled in
      surgical operations, the other as sagacious in detecting and
      appreciating morbid symptoms. It was Podaleirius who first noticed
      the glaring eyes and disturbed deportment which preceded the suicide
      of Ajax.

      "Galen appears uncertain whether Asklepius (as well as Dionysus) was
      originally a god, or whether he was first a man and then became
      afterwards a god; but Apollodorus professed to fix the exact date of
      his apotheosis. Throughout all the historical ages the descendants
      of Asklepius were numerous and widely diffused. The many families or
      gentes, called Asklepiads, who devoted themselves to the study and
      practice of medicine, and who principally dwelt near the temples of
      Asklepius, whither sick and suffering men came to obtain relief--all
      recognized the god not merely as the object of their common worship,
      but also as their actual progenitor."--Grote vol. i. p. 248.

          133 "The plant she bruises with a stone, and stands
        Tempering the juice between her ivory hands
        This o'er her breast she sheds with sovereign art
        And bathes with gentle touch the wounded part
        The wound such virtue from the juice derives,
        At once the blood is stanch'd, the youth revives."

                                               "Orlando Furioso,"  book 1.

  134 --_Well might I wish._

        "Would heav'n (said he) my strength and youth recall,
        Such as I was beneath Praeneste's wall--
        Then when I made the foremost foes retire,
        And set whole heaps of conquer'd shields on fire;
        When Herilus in single fight I slew,
        Whom with three lives Feronia did endue."

                                               Dryden's Virgil, viii. 742.

  135 --_Sthenelus,_ a son of Capaneus, one of the Epigoni. He was one of
      the suitors of Helen, and is said to have been one of those who
      entered Troy inside the wooden horse.

  136 --_Forwarn'd the horrors._ The same portent has already been
      mentioned. To this day, modern nations are not wholly free from this
      superstition.

  137 --_Sevenfold city,_ Boeotian Thebes, which had seven gates.

  138 --_As when the winds._

        "Thus, when a black-brow'd gust begins to rise,
        White foam at first on the curl'd ocean fries;
        Then roars the main, the billows mount the skies,
        Till, by the fury of the storm full blown,
        The muddy billow o'er the clouds is thrown."

                                                Dryden's Virgil, vii. 736.

            139 "Stood
        Like Teneriffe or Atlas unremoved;
        His stature reach'd the sky."

                                                --"Paradise Lost," iv. 986.

  140 The Abantes seem to have been of Thracian origin.

  141 I may, once for all, remark that Homer is most anatomically correct
      as to the parts of the body in which a wound would be immediately
      mortal.

  142 --_Ćnus,_ a fountain almost proverbial for its coldness.

  143 Compare Tasso, Gier. Lib., xx. 7:

        "Nuovo favor del cielo in lui niluce
        E 'l fa grande, et angusto oltre il costume.
        Gl' empie d' honor la faccia, e vi riduce
        Di giovinezza il bel purpureo lume."

          144 "Or deluges, descending on the plains,
        Sweep o'er the yellow year, destroy the pains
        Of lab'ring oxen, and the peasant's gains;
        Uproot the forest oaks, and bear away
        Flocks, folds, and trees, an undistinguish'd prey."

                                                  Dryden's Virgil ii. 408.

  145 --_From mortal mists._

          "But to nobler sights
        Michael from Adam's eyes the film removed."

                                                 "Paradise Lost," xi. 411.

  146 --_The race of those._

        "A pair of coursers, born of heav'nly breed,
        Who from their nostrils breathed ethereal fire;
        Whom Circe stole from her celestial sire,
        By substituting mares produced on earth,
        Whose wombs conceived a more than mortal birth.

                                           Dryden's Virgil, vii. 386, sqq.

  147 The belief in the existence of men of larger stature in earlier
      times, is by no means confined to Homer.

  148 --_Such stream, i.e._ the _ichor,_ or blood of the gods.

        "A stream of nect'rous humour issuing flow'd,
        Sanguine, such as celestial spirits may bleed."

                                                 "Paradise Lost," vi. 339.

  149 This was during the wars with the Titans.

  150 --_Amphitryon's son,_ Hercules, born to Jove by Alcmena, the wife of
      Amphitryon.

  151 --_Ćgiale_ daughter of Adrastus. The Cyclic poets (See Anthon's
      Lempriere, _s. v._) assert Venus incited her to infidelity, in
      revenge for the wound she had received from her husband.

  152 --_Pherae,_ a town of Pelasgiotis, in Thessaly.

  153 --_Tlepolemus,_ son of Hercules and Astyochia. Having left his native
      country, Argos, in consequence of the accidental murder of
      Liscymnius, he was commanded by an oracle to retire to Rhodes. Here
      he was chosen king, and accompanied the Trojan expedition. After his
      death, certain games were instituted at Rhodes in his honour, the
      victors being rewarded with crowns of poplar.

  154 These heroes' names have since passed into a kind of proverb,
      designating the _oi polloi_ or mob.

  155 --_Spontaneous open._

        "Veil'd with his gorgeous wings, upspringing light
        Flew through the midst of heaven; th' angelic quires,
        On each hand parting, to his speed gave way
        Through all th' empyreal road; till at the gate
        Of heaven arrived, the gate self-open'd wide,
        On golden hinges turning."

                                                 --"Paradise Lost," v. 250.

          156 "Till Morn,
        Waked by the circling Hours, with rosy hand
        Unbarr'd the gates of light."

                                                  --"Paradise Lost," vi, 2.

  157 --_Far as a shepherd._ "With what majesty and pomp does Homer exalt
      his deities! He here measures the leap of the horses by the extent
      of the world. And who is there, that, considering the exceeding
      greatness of the space would not with reason cry out that 'If the
      steeds of the deity were to take a second leap, the world would want
      room for it'?"--Longinus, Section 8.

  158 "No trumpets, or any other instruments of sound, are used in the
      Homeric action itself; but the trumpet was known, and is introduced
      for the purpose of illustration as employed in war. Hence arose the
      value of a loud voice in a commander; Stentor was an indispensable
      officer... In the early Saracen campaigns frequent mention is made
      of the service rendered by men of uncommonly strong voices; the
      battle of Honain was restored by the shouts and menaces of Abbas,
      the uncle of Mohammed," &c.--Coleridge, p. 213.

          159 "Long had the wav'ring god the war delay'd,
        While Greece and Troy alternate own'd his aid."

                                    Merrick's "Tryphiodorus," vi. 761, sq.

  160 --_Paeon_ seems to have been to the gods, what Podaleirius and
      Machaon were to the Grecian heroes.

  161 --_Arisbe,_ a colony of the Mitylenaeans in Troas.

  162 --_Pedasus,_ a town near Pylos.

  163 --_Rich heaps of brass._ "The halls of Alkinous and Menelaus glitter
      with gold, copper, and electrum; while large stocks of yet
      unemployed metal--gold, copper, and iron are stored up in the
      treasure-chamber of Odysseus and other chiefs. Coined money is
      unknown in the Homeric age--the trade carried on being one of barter.
      In reference also to the metals, it deserves to be remarked, that
      the Homeric descriptions universally suppose copper, and not iron,
      to be employed for arms, both offensive and defensive. By what
      process the copper was tempered and hardened, so as to serve the
      purpose of the warrior, we do not know; but the use of iron for
      these objects belongs to a later age."--Grote, vol. ii. p. 142.

  164 --_Oh impotent,_ &c. "In battle, quarter seems never to have been
      given, except with a view to the ransom of the prisoner. Agamemnon
      reproaches Menelaus with unmanly softness, when he is on the point
      of sparing a fallen enemy, and himself puts the suppliant to the
      sword."--Thirlwall, vol. i. p. 181

          165 "The ruthless steel, impatient of delay,
        Forbade the sire to linger out the day.
        It struck the bending father to the earth,
        And cropt the wailing infant at the birth.
        Can innocents the rage of parties know,
        And they who ne'er offended find a foe?"

                                                     Rowe's Lucan, bk. ii.

          166 "Meantime the Trojan dames, oppress'd with woe,
        To Pallas' fane in long procession go,
        In hopes to reconcile their heav'nly foe:
        They weep; they beat their breasts; they rend their hair,
        And rich embroider'd vests for presents bear."

                                                   Dryden's Virgil, i. 670

  167 The manner in which this episode is introduced, is well illustrated
      by the following remarks of Mure, vol. i. p.298: "The poet's method
      of introducing his episode, also, illustrates in a curious manner
      his tact in the dramatic department of his art. Where, for example,
      one or more heroes are despatched on some commission, to be executed
      at a certain distance of time or place, the fulfilment of this task
      is not, as a general rule, immediately described. A certain interval
      is allowed them for reaching the appointed scene of action, which
      interval is dramatised, as it were, either by a temporary
      continuation of the previous narrative, or by fixing attention for a
      while on some new transaction, at the close of which the further
      account of the mission is resumed."

  168 --_With tablets sealed._ These probably were only devices of a
      hieroglyphical character. Whether writing was known in the Homeric
      times is utterly uncertain. See Grote, vol ii. p. 192, sqq.

  169 --_Solymaean crew,_ a people of Lycia.

  170 From this "melancholy madness" of Bellerophon, hypochondria received
      the name of "Morbus Bellerophonteus." See my notes in my prose
      translation, p. 112. The "Aleian field," _i.e._ "the plain of
      wandering," was situated between the rivers Pyramus and Pinarus, in
      Cilicia.

  171 --_His own, of gold._ This bad bargain has passed into a common
      proverb. See Aulus Gellius, ii, 23.

  172 --_Scaean, i e._ left hand.

  173 --_In fifty chambers._

        "The fifty nuptial beds, (such hopes had he,
        So large a promise of a progeny,)
        The ports of plated gold, and hung with spoils."

                                                   Dryden's Virgil, ii.658

  174 --_O would kind earth,_ &c. "It is apparently a sudden, irregular
      burst of popular indignation to which Hector alludes, when he
      regrets that the Trojans had not spirit enough to cover Paris with a
      mantle of stones. This, however, was also one of the ordinary formal
      modes of punishment for great public offences. It may have been
      originally connected with the same feeling--the desire of avoiding
      the pollution of bloodshed--which seems to have suggested the
      practice of burying prisoners alive, with a scantling of food by
      their side. Though Homer makes no mention of this horrible usage,
      the example of the Roman Vestals affords reasons for believing that,
      in ascribing it to the heroic ages, Sophocles followed an authentic
      tradition."--Thirlwall's Greece, vol. i. p. 171, sq.

  175 --_Paris' lofty dome._ "With respect to the private dwellings, which
      are oftenest described, the poet's language barely enables us to
      form a general notion of their ordinary plan, and affords no
      conception of the style which prevailed in them or of their effect
      on the eye. It seems indeed probable, from the manner in which he
      dwells on their metallic ornaments that the higher beauty of
      proportion was but little required or understood, and it is,
      perhaps, strength and convenience, rather than elegance, that he
      means to commend, in speaking of the fair house which Paris had
      built for himself with the aid of the most skilful masons of
      Troy."--Thirlwall's Greece, vol. i. p. 231.

  176 --_The wanton courser._

        "Come destrier, che da le regie stalle
          Ove a l'usa de l'arme si riserba,
        Fugge, e libero al fiu per largo calle
          Va tragl' armenti, o al fiume usato, o a l'herba."

                                                        Gier, Lib. ix. 75.

  177 --_Casque._ The original word is stephanae, about the meaning of
      which there is some little doubt. Some take it for a different kind
      of cap or helmet, others for the rim, others for the cone, of the
      helmet.

  178 --_Athenian maid:_ Minerva.

  179 --_Celadon,_ a river of Elis.

  180 --_Oileus, i.e._ Ajax, the son of Oileus, in contradistinction to
      Ajax, son of Telamon.

  181 --_In the general's helm._ It was customary to put the lots into a
      helmet, in which they were well shaken up; each man then took his
      choice.

  182 --_God of Thrace._ Mars, or Mavors, according to his Thracian
      epithet. Hence "Mavortia Moenia."

  183 --_Grimly he smiled._

          "And death
        Grinn'd horribly a ghastly smile."

                                                --"Paradise Lost," ii. 845.

          "There Mavors stands
        Grinning with ghastly feature."

                                                  --Carey's Dante: Hell, v.

          184 "Sete o guerrieri, incomincio Pindoro,
        Con pari honor di pari ambo possenti,
        Dunque cessi la pugna, e non sian rotte
        Le ragioni, e 'l riposo, e de la notte."

                                                       --Gier. Lib. vi. 51.

  185 It was an ancient style of compliment to give a larger portion of
      food to the conqueror, or person to whom respect was to be shown.
      See Virg. Ćn. viii. 181. Thus Benjamin was honoured with a "double
      portion." Gen. xliii. 34.

  186 --_Embattled walls._ "Another essential basis of mechanical unity in
      the poem is the construction of the rampart. This takes place in the
      seventh book. The reason ascribed for the glaring improbability that
      the Greeks should have left their camp and fleet unfortified during
      nine years, in the midst of a hostile country, is a purely poetical
      one: 'So long as Achilles fought, the terror of his name sufficed to
      keep every foe at a distance.' The disasters consequent on his
      secession first led to the necessity of other means of protection.
      Accordingly, in the battles previous to the eighth book, no allusion
      occurs to a rampart; in all those which follow it forms a prominent
      feature. Here, then, in the anomaly as in the propriety of the
      Iliad, the destiny of Achilles, or rather this peculiar crisis of
      it, forms the pervading bond of connexion to the whole poem."--Mure,
      vol. i., p. 257.

  187 --_What cause of fear,_ &c.

        "Seest thou not this? Or do we fear in vain
        Thy boasted thunders, and thy thoughtless reign?"

                                                 Dryden's Virgil, iv. 304.

  188 --_In exchange._ These lines are referred to by Theophilus, the Roman
      lawyer, iii. tit. xxiii. Section 1, as exhibiting the most ancient
      mention of barter.

  189 "A similar bond of connexion, in the military details of the
      narrative, is the decree issued by Jupiter, at the commencement of
      the eighth book, against any further interference of the gods in the
      battles. In the opening of the twentieth book this interdict is
      withdrawn. During the twelve intermediate books it is kept steadily
      in view. No interposition takes place but on the part of the
      specially authorised agents of Jove, or on that of one or two
      contumacious deities, described as boldly setting his commands at
      defiance, but checked and reprimanded for their disobedience; while
      the other divine warriors, who in the previous and subsequent cantos
      are so active in support of their favourite heroes, repeatedly
      allude to the supreme edict as the cause of their present
      inactivity."--Mure, vol. i. p 257. See however, Muller, "Greek
      Literature," ch. v. Section 6, and Grote, vol. ii. p. 252.

          190 "As far removed from God and light of heaven,
        As from the centre thrice to th' utmost pole."

                                                         --"Paradise Lost."

        "E quanto e da le stelle al basso inferno,
        Tanto e piu in su de la stellata spera"

                                                         --Gier. Lib. i. 7.

      "Some of the epithets which Homer applies to the heavens seem to
      imply that he considered it as a solid vault of metal. But it is not
      necessary to construe these epithets so literally, nor to draw any
      such inference from his description of Atlas, who holds the lofty
      pillars which keep earth and heaven asunder. Yet it would seem, from
      the manner in which the height of heaven is compared with the depth
      of Tartarus, that the region of light was thought to have certain
      bounds. The summit of the Thessalian Olympus was regarded as the
      highest point on the earth, and it is not always carefully
      distinguished from the aerian regions above The idea of a seat of
      the gods--perhaps derived from a more ancient tradition, in which it
      was not attached to any geographical site--seems to be indistinctly
      blended in the poet's mind with that of the real
      mountain."--Thirlwall's Greece, vol. i. p. 217, sq.

          191 "Now lately heav'n, earth, another world
        Hung e'er my realm, link'd in a golden chain
        To that side heav'n."

                                               --"Paradise Lost," ii. 1004.

  192 --_His golden scales._

        "Jove now, sole arbiter of peace and war,
        Held forth the fatal balance from afar:
        Each host he weighs; by turns they both prevail,
        Till Troy descending fix'd the doubtful scale."

                                       Merrick's Tryphiodorus, v 687, sqq.

        "Th' Eternal, to prevent such horrid fray,
        Hung forth in heav'n his golden scales,
        Wherein all things created first he weighed;
        The pendulous round earth, with balanced air
        In counterpoise; now ponders all events,
        Battles and realms. In these he puts two weights,
        The sequel each of parting and of fight:
        The latter quick up flew, and kick'd the beam."

                                                 "Paradise Lost," iv. 496.

  193 --_And now,_ &c.

          "And now all heaven
        Had gone to wrack, with ruin overspread;
        Had not th' Almighty Father, where he sits
        ... foreseen."

                                                --"Paradise Lost," vi. 669.

  194 --_Gerenian Nestor._ The epithet _Gerenian_ either refers to the name
      of a place in which Nestor was educated, or merely signifies
      honoured, revered. See Schol. Venet. in II. B. 336; Strabo, viii. p.
      340.

  195 --_Ćgae, Helice._ Both these towns were conspicuous for their worship
      of Neptune.

  196 --_As full blown,_ &c.

        "Il suo Lesbia quasi bel fior succiso,
        E in atto si gentil languir tremanti
        Gl' occhi, e cader siu 'l tergo il collo mira."

                                                        Gier. Lib. ix. 85.

  197 --_Ungrateful,_ because the cause in which they were engaged was
      unjust.

        "Struck by the lab'ring priests' uplifted hands
        The victims fall: to heav'n they make their pray'r,
        The curling vapours load the ambient air.
        But vain their toil: the pow'rs who rule the skies
        Averse beheld the ungrateful sacrifice."

                                     Merrick's Tryphiodorus, vi. 527, sqq.

          198 "As when about the silver moon, when aire is free from
                    winde,
        And stars shine cleare, to whose sweet beams high prospects on the
                    brows
        Of all steepe hills and pinnacles thrust up themselves for shows,
        And even the lowly valleys joy to glitter in their sight;
        When the unmeasured firmament bursts to disclose her light,
        And all the signs in heaven are seene, that glad the shepherd's
                    heart."

                                                                  Chapman.

  199 This flight of the Greeks, according to Buttmann, Lexil. p. 358, was
      not a supernatural flight caused by the gods, but "a great and
      general one, caused by Hector and the Trojans, but with the approval
      of Jove."

  200 Grote, vol. ii. p. 91, after noticing the modest calmness and
      respect with which Nestor addresses Agamemnon, observes, "The
      Homeric Council is a purely consultative body, assembled not with
      any power of peremptorily arresting mischievous resolves of the
      king, but solely for his information and guidance."

  201 In the heroic times, it is not unfrequent for the king to receive
      presents to purchase freedom from his wrath, or immunity from his
      exactions. Such gifts gradually became regular, and formed the
      income of the German, (Tacit. Germ. Section 15) Persian, (Herodot.
      iii.89), and other kings. So, too, in the middle ages, 'The feudal
      aids are the beginning of taxation, of which they for a long time
      answered the purpose.' (Hallam, Middle Ages, ch. x. pt. 1, p. 189)
      This fact frees Achilles from the apparent charge of sordidness.
      Plato, however, (De Rep. vi. 4), says, "We cannot commend Phoenix,
      the tutor of Achilles, as if he spoke correctly, when counselling
      him to accept of presents and assist the Greeks, but, without
      presents, not to desist from his wrath, nor again, should we commend
      Achilles himself, or approve of his being so covetous as to receive
      presents from Agamemnon," &c.

  202 It may be observed, that, brief as is the mention of Briseis in the
      Iliad, and small the part she plays--what little is said is
      pre-eminently calculated to enhance her fitness to be the bride of
      Achilles. Purity, and retiring delicacy, are features well
      contrasted with the rough, but tender disposition of the hero.

  203 --_Laodice._ Iphianassa, or Iphigenia, is not mentioned by Homer,
      among the daughters of Agamemnon.

  204 "Agamemnon, when he offers to transfer to Achilles seven towns
      inhabited by wealthy husbandmen, who would enrich their lord by
      presents and tribute, seems likewise to assume rather a property in
      them, than an authority over them. And the same thing may be
      intimated when it is said that Peleus bestowed a great people, the
      Dolopes of Phthia, on Phoenix."--Thirlwall's Greece, vol. i Section
      6, p. 162, note.

  205 --_Pray in deep silence._ Rather: "use well-omened words;" or, as
      Kennedy has explained it, "Abstain from expressions unsuitable to
      the solemnity of the occasion, which, by offending the god, might
      defeat the object of their supplications."

  206 --_Purest hands._ This is one of the most ancient superstitions
      respecting prayer, and one founded as much in nature as in
      tradition.

  207 It must be recollected, that the war at Troy was not a settled
      siege, and that many of the chieftains busied themselves in
      piratical expeditions about its neighborhood. Such a one was that of
      which Achilles now speaks. From the following verses, it is evident
      that fruits of these maraudings went to the common support of the
      expedition, and not to the successful plunderer.

  208 --_Pthia,_ the capital of Achilles' Thessalian domains.

  209 --_Orchomenian town._ The topography of Orchomenus, in Boeotia,
      "situated," as it was, "on the northern bank of the lake Ćpais,
      which receives not only the river Cephisus from the valleys of
      Phocis, but also other rivers from Parnassus and Helicon" (Grote,
      vol. p. 181), was a sufficient reason for its prosperity and decay.
      "As long as the channels of these waters were diligently watched and
      kept clear, a large portion of the lake was in the condition of
      alluvial land, pre-eminently rich and fertile. But when the channels
      came to be either neglected, or designedly choked up by an enemy,
      the water accumulated in such a degree as to occupy the soil of more
      than one ancient islet, and to occasion the change of the site of
      Orchomenus itself from the plain to the declivity of Mount
      Hyphanteion." (Ibid.)

  210 The phrase "hundred gates," &c., seems to be merely expressive of a
      great number. See notes to my prose translation, p. 162.

  211 Compare the following pretty lines of Quintus Calaber (Dyce's Select
      Translations, p 88).--

          "Many gifts he gave, and o'er
        Dolopia bade me rule; thee in his arms
        He brought an infant, on my bosom laid
        The precious charge, and anxiously enjoin'd
        That I should rear thee as my own with all
        A parent's love. I fail'd not in my trust
        And oft, while round my neck thy hands were lock'd,
        From thy sweet lips the half articulate sound
        Of Father came; and oft, as children use,
        Mewling and puking didst thou drench my tunic."

      "This description," observes my learned friend (notes, p. 121) "is
      taken from the passage of Homer, II ix, in translating which, Pope,
      with that squeamish, artificial taste, which distinguished the age
      of Anne, omits the natural (and, let me add, affecting)
      circumstance."

          "And the wine
        Held to thy lips, and many a time in fits
        Of infant frowardness the purple juice
        Rejecting thou hast deluged all my vest,
        And fill'd my bosom."

                                                                  --Cowper.

  212 --_Where Calydon._ For a good sketch of the story of Meleager, too
      long to be inserted here, see Grote, vol. i. p. 195, sqq.; and for
      the authorities, see my notes to the prose translation, p. 166.

  213 "_Gifts can conquer_"--It is well observed by Bishop Thirlwall,
      "Greece," vol. i. p, 180, that the law of honour among the Greeks
      did not compel them to treasure up in their memory the offensive
      language which might be addressed to them by a passionate adversary,
      nor to conceive that it left a stain which could only be washed away
      by blood. Even for real and deep injuries they were commonly willing
      to accept a pecuniary compensation."

  214 "The boon of sleep."--Milton

          215 "All else of nature's common gift partake:
        Unhappy Dido was alone awake."

                                                --Dryden's Virgil, iv. 767.

  216 --_The king of Crete:_ Idomeneus.

  217 --_Soft wool within, i e._ a kind of woollen stuffing, pressed in
      between the straps, to protect the head, and make the helmet fit
      close.

  218 "All the circumstances of this action--the night, Rhesus buried in a
      profound sleep, and Diomede with the sword in his hand hanging over
      the head of that prince--furnished Homer with the idea of this
      fiction, which represents Rhesus lying fast asleep, and, as it were,
      beholding his enemy in a dream, plunging the sword into his bosom.
      This image is very natural; for a man in his condition awakes no
      farther than to see confusedly what environs him, and to think it
      not a reality but a dream."--Pope.

        "There's one did laugh in his sleep, and one cry'd murder;
        They wak'd each other."

                                                               --_Macbeth._

          219 "Aurora now had left her saffron bed,
        And beams of early light the heavens o'erspread."

                                                  Dryden's Virgil, iv. 639

  220 --_Red drops of blood._ "This phenomenon, if a mere fruit of the
      poet's imagination, might seem arbitrary or far-fetched. It is one,
      however, of ascertained reality, and of no uncommon occurrence in
      the climate of Greece."--Mure, i p. 493. Cf. Tasso, Gier. Lib. ix.
      15:

        "La terra in vece del notturno gelo
        Bagnan rugiade tepide, e sanguigne."

          221 "No thought of flight,
        None of retreat, no unbecoming deed
        That argued fear."

                                                --"Paradise Lost," vi. 236.

  222 --_One of love._ Although a bastard brother received only a small
      portion of the inheritance, he was commonly very well treated. Priam
      appears to be the only one of whom polygamy is directly asserted in
      the Iliad. Grote, vol. ii. p. 114, note.

          223 "Circled with foes as when a packe of bloodie jackals cling
        About a goodly palmed hart, hurt with a hunter's bow
        Whose escape his nimble feet insure, whilst his warm blood doth
                    flow,
        And his light knees have power to move: but (maistred by his
                    wound)
        Embost within a shady hill, the jackals charge him round,
        And teare his flesh--when instantly fortune sends in the powers
        Of some sterne lion, with whose sighte they flie and he devours.
        So they around Ulysses prest."

                                                                 --Chapman.

  224 --_Simois, railing,_ &c.

          "In those bloody fields
        Where Simois rolls the bodies and the shields
        Of heroes."

                                                 --Dryden's Virgil, i. 142.

          225 "Where yon disorder'd heap of ruin lies,
        Stones rent from stones,--where clouds of dust arise,--
        Amid that smother, Neptune holds his place,
        Below the wall's foundation drives his mace,
        And heaves the building from the solid base."

                                                 Dryden's Virgil, ii. 825.

  226 --_Why boast we._

          "Wherefore do I assume
        These royalties and not refuse to reign,
        Refusing to accept as great a share
        Of hazard as of honour, due alike to him
        Who reigns, and so much to him due
        Of hazard more, as he above the rest
        High honour'd sits."

                                                --"Paradise Lost," ii. 450.

  227 --_Each equal weight._

          "Long time in even scale
        The battle hung."

                                                --"Paradise Lost," vi. 245.

          228 "He on his impious foes right onward drove,
        _Gloomy as night._"

                                                 --"Paradise Lost," vi. 831

  229 --_Renown'd for justice and for length of days,_ Arrian. de Exp.
      Alex. iv. p. 239, also speaks of the independence of these people,
      which he regards as the result of their poverty and uprightness.
      Some authors have regarded the phrase "Hippomolgian," _i.e._
      "milking their mares," as an epithet applicable to numerous tribes,
      since the oldest of the Samatian nomads made their mares' milk one
      of their chief articles of diet. The epithet abion or abion, in this
      passage, has occasioned much discussion. It may mean, according as
      we read it, either "long-lived," or "bowless," the latter epithet
      indicating that they did not depend upon archery for subsistence.

  230 Compare Chapman's quaint, bold verses:--

        "And as a round piece of a rocke, which with a winter's flood
        Is from his top torn, when a shoure poured from a bursten cloud,
        Hath broke the naturall band it had within the roughftey rock,
        Flies jumping all adourne the woods, resounding everie shocke,
        And on, uncheckt, it headlong leaps till in a plaine it stay,
        And then (tho' never so impelled), it stirs not any way:--
        So Hector,--"

  231 This book forms a most agreeable interruption to The continuous
      round of battles, which occupy the latter part of the Iliad. It is
      as well to observe, that the sameness of these scenes renders many
      notes unnecessary.

  232 --_Who to Tydeus owes, i.e._ Diomed.

  233 Compare Tasso:--

        Teneri sdegni, e placide, e tranquille
        Repulse, e cari vezzi, e liete paci,
        Sorrisi, parolette, e dolci stille
        Di pianto, e sospir tronchi, e molli baci."

                                                        Gier. Lib. xvi. 25

  234 Compare the description of the dwelling of Sleep in Orlando Furioso,
      bk. vi.

          235 "Twice seven, the charming daughters of the main--
        Around my person wait, and bear my train:
        Succeed my wish, and second my design,
        The fairest, Deiopeia, shall be thine."

                                         Dryden's Virgil, Ćn. i. 107, seq.

  236 --_And Minos._ "By Homer, Minos is described as the son of Jupiter,
      and of the daughter of Phoenix, whom all succeeding authors name
      Europa; and he is thus carried back into the remotest period of
      Cretan antiquity known to the poet, apparently as a native hero,
      Illustrious enough for a divine parentage, and too ancient to allow
      his descent to be traced to any other source. But in a genealogy
      recorded by later writers, he is likewise the adopted son of
      Asterius, as descendant of Dorus, the son of Helen, and is thus
      connected with a colony said to have been led into Creta by
      Tentamus, or Tectamus, son of Dorus, who is related either to have
      crossed over from Thessaly, or to have embarked at Malea after
      having led his followers by land into Laconia."--Thirlwall, p. 136,
      seq.

  237 Milton has emulated this passage, in describing the couch of our
      first parents:--

          "Underneath the violet,
        Crocus, and hyacinth with rich inlay,
        'Broider'd the ground."

                                                --"Paradise Lost," iv. 700.

  238 --_He lies protected,_

        "Forthwith on all sides to his aid was run
        By angels many and strong, who interpos'd
        Defence, while others bore him on their shields
        Back to his chariot, where it stood retir'd
        From off the files of war; there they him laid,
        Gnashing for anguish, and despite, and shame."

                                            "Paradise Lost," vi. 335, seq.

  239 --_The brazen dome._ See the note on Bk. viii. Page 142.

  240 --_For, by the gods! who flies._ Observe the bold ellipsis of "he
      cries," and the transition from the direct to the oblique
      construction. So in Milton:--

        "Thus at their shady lodge arriv'd, both stood,
        Both turn'd, and under open sky ador'd
        The God that made both sky, air, earth, and heaven,
        Which they beheld, the moon's resplendent globe,
        And starry pole.--Thou also mad'st the night,
        Maker omnipotent, and thou the day."

                                         Milton, "Paradise Lost," Book iv.

  241 --_So some tall rock._

        "But like a rock unmov'd, a rock that braves
        The raging tempest, and the rising waves--
        Propp'd on himself he stands: his solid sides
        Wash off the sea-weeds, and the sounding tides."

                                                Dryden's Virgil, vii. 809.

  242 Protesilaus was the first Greek who fell, slain by Hector, as he
      leaped from the vessel to the Trojan shore. He was buried on the
      Chersonese, near the city of Plagusa. Hygin Fab. ciii. Tzetz. on
      Lycophr. 245, 528. There is a most elegant tribute to his memory in
      the Preface to the Heroica of Philostratus.

  243 --_His best beloved._ The following elegant remarks of Thirlwall
      (Greece, vol. i, p. 176 seq.) well illustrate the character of the
      friendship subsisting between these two heroes--

      "One of the noblest and most amiable sides of the Greek character,
      is the readiness with which it lent itself to construct intimate and
      durable friendships, and this is a feature no less prominent in the
      earliest than in later times. It was indeed connected with the
      comparatively low estimation in which female society was held; but
      the devotedness and constancy with which these attachments were
      maintained, was not the less admirable and engaging. The heroic
      companions whom we find celebrated partly by Homer and partly in
      traditions which, if not of equal antiquity, were grounded on the
      same feeling, seem to have but one heart and soul, with scarcely a
      wish or object apart, and only to live as they are always ready to
      die for one another. It is true that the relation between them is
      not always one of perfect equality; but this is a circumstance
      which, while it often adds a peculiar charm to the poetical
      description, detracts little from the dignity of the idea which it
      presents. Such were the friendships of Hercules and Iolaus, of
      Theseus and Pirithous, of Orestes and Pylades; and though These may
      owe the greater part of their fame to the later epic or even
      dramatic poetry, the moral groundwork undoubtedly subsisted in the
      period to which the traditions are referred. The argument of the
      Iliad mainly turns on the affection of Achilles for Patroclus, whose
      love for the greater hero is only tempered by reverence for his
      higher birth and his unequalled prowess. But the mutual regard which
      united Idomeneus and Meriones, Diomedes and Sthenelus, though, as
      the persons themselves are less important, it is kept more in the
      back-ground, is manifestly viewed by the poet in the same light. The
      idea of a Greek hero seems not to have been thought complete,
      without such a brother in arms by his side."--Thirlwall, Greece, vol.
      i. p. 176, seq.

          244 "As hungry wolves with raging appetite,
        Scour through the fields, ne'er fear the stormy night--
        Their whelps at home expect the promised food,
        And long to temper their dry chaps in blood--
        So rush'd we forth at once."

                                                --Dryden's Virgil, ii. 479.

  245 --_The destinies ordain._--"In the mythology, also, of the Iliad,
      purely Pagan as it is, we discover one important truth unconsciously
      involved, which was almost entirely lost from view amidst the nearly
      equal scepticism and credulity of subsequent ages. Zeus or Jupiter
      is popularly to be taken as omnipotent. No distinct empire is
      assigned to fate or fortune; the will of the father of gods and men
      is absolute and uncontrollable. This seems to be the true character
      of the Homeric deity, and it is very necessary that the student of
      Greek literature should bear it constantly in mind. A strong
      instance in the Iliad itself to illustrate this position, is the
      passage where Jupiter laments to Juno the approaching death of
      Sarpedon. 'Alas me!' says he 'since it is fated (moira) that
      Sarpedon, dearest to me of men, should be slain by Patroclus, the
      son of Menoetius! Indeed, my heart is divided within me while I
      ruminate it in my mind, whether having snatched him up from out of
      the lamentable battle, I should not at once place him alive in the
      fertile land of his own Lycia, or whether I should now destroy him
      by the hands of the son of Menoetius!' To which Juno answers--'Dost
      thou mean to rescue from death a mortal man, long since destined by
      fate (palai pepromenon)? You may do it--but we, the rest of the gods,
      do not sanction it.' Here it is clear from both speakers, that
      although Sarpedon is said to be fated to die, Jupiter might still,
      if he pleased, save him, and place him entirely out of the reach of
      any such event, and further, in the alternative, that Jupiter
      himself would destroy him by the hands of another."--Coleridge, p.
      156. seq.

  246 --_Thrice at the battlements._ "The art military of the Homeric age
      is upon a level with the state of navigation just described,
      personal prowess decided every thing; the night attack and the
      ambuscade, although much esteemed, were never upon a large scale.
      The chiefs fight in advance, and enact almost as much as the knights
      of romance. The siege of Troy was as little like a modern siege as a
      captain in the guards is like Achilles. There is no mention of a
      ditch or any other line or work round the town, and the wall itself
      was accessible without a ladder. It was probably a vast mound of
      earth with a declivity outwards. Patroclus thrice mounts it in
      armour. The Trojans are in no respects blockaded, and receive
      assistance from their allies to the very end."--Coleridge, p. 212.

  247 --_Ciconians._--A people of Thrace, near the Hebrus.

  248 --_They wept._

        "Fast by the manger stands the inactive steed,
        And, sunk in sorrow, hangs his languid head;
        He stands, and careless of his golden grain,
        Weeps his associates and his master slain."

                                         Merrick's Tryphiodorus, v. 18-24.

        "Nothing is heard upon the mountains now,
        But pensive herds that for their master low,
        Straggling and comfortless about they rove,
        Unmindful of their pasture and their love."

                                         Moschus, id. 3, parodied, _ibid._

        "To close the pomp, Ćthon, the steed of state,
        Is led, the funeral of his lord to wait.
        Stripp'd of his trappings, with a sullen pace
        He walks, and the big tears run rolling down his face."

                                                   Dryden's Virgil, bk. ii

  249 --_Some brawny bull._

        "Like to a bull, that with impetuous spring
        Darts, at the moment when the fatal blow
        Hath struck him, but unable to proceed
        Plunges on either side."

                                             --Carey's Dante: Hell, c. xii.

  250 This is connected with the earlier part of last book, the regular
      narrative being interrupted by the message of Antilochus and the
      lamentations of Achilles.

  251 --_Far in the deep._ So Oceanus hears the lamentations of Prometheus,
      in the play of Ćschylus, and comes from the depths of the sea to
      comfort him.

  252 Opuntia, a city of Locris.

  253 Quintus Calaber, lib. v., has attempted to rival Homer in his
      description of the shield of the same hero. A few extracts from Mr.
      Dyce's version (Select Translations, p. 104, seq.) may here be
      introduced.

        "In the wide circle of the shield were seen
        Refulgent images of various forms,
        The work of Vulcan; who had there described
        The heaven, the ether, and the earth and sea,
        The winds, the clouds, the moon, the sun, apart
        In different stations; and you there might view
        The stars that gem the still-revolving heaven,
        And, under them, the vast expanse of air,
        In which, with outstretch'd wings, the long-beak'd bird
        Winnow'd the gale, as if instinct with life.
        Around the shield the waves of ocean flow'd,
        The realms of Tethys, which unnumber'd streams,
        In azure mazes rolling o'er the earth,
        Seem'd to augment."

  254 --_On seats of stone._ "Several of the old northern Sagas represent
      the old men assembled for the purpose of judging as sitting on great
      stones, in a circle called the Urtheilsring or gerichtsring"-- Grote,
      ii. p. 100, note. On the independence of the judicial office in The
      heroic times, see Thirlwall's Greece, vol. i. p. 166.

  255 --_Another part,_ &c.

          "And here
        Were horrid wars depicted; grimly pale
        Were heroes lying with their slaughter'd steeds
        Upon the ground incarnadin'd with blood.
        Stern stalked Bellona, smear'd with reeking gore,
        Through charging ranks; beside her Rout was seen,
        And Terror, Discord to the fatal strife
        Inciting men, and Furies breathing flames:
        Nor absent were the Fates, and the tall shape
        Of ghastly Death, round whom did Battles throng,
        Their limbs distilling plenteous blood and sweat;
        And Gorgons, whose long locks were twisting snakes.
        That shot their forky tongues incessant forth.
        Such were the horrors of dire war."

                                                          --Dyce's Calaber.

  256 --_A field deep furrowed._

        "Here was a corn field; reapers in a row,
        Each with a sharp-tooth'd sickle in his hand,
        Work'd busily, and, as the harvest fell,
        Others were ready still to bind the sheaves:
        Yoked to a wain that bore the corn away
        The steers were moving; sturdy bullocks here
        The plough were drawing, and the furrow'd glebe
        Was black behind them, while with goading wand
        The active youths impell'd them. Here a feast
        Was graved: to the shrill pipe and ringing lyre
        A band of blooming virgins led the dance.
        As if endued with life."

                                                          --Dyce's Calaber.

  257 Coleridge (Greek Classic Poets, p. 182, seq.) has diligently
      compared this with the description of the shield of Hercules by
      Hesiod. He remarks that, "with two or three exceptions, the imagery
      differs in little more than the names and arrangements; and the
      difference of arrangement in the Shield of Hercules is altogether
      for the worse. The natural consecution of the Homeric images needs
      no exposition: it constitutes in itself one of the beauties of the
      work. The Hesiodic images are huddled together without connection or
      congruity: Mars and Pallas are awkwardly introduced among the
      Centaurs and Lapithae;-- but the gap is wide indeed between them and
      Apollo with the Muses, waking the echoes of Olympus to celestial
      harmonies; whence however, we are hurried back to Perseus, the
      Gorgons, and other images of war, over an arm of the sea, in which
      the sporting dolphins, the fugitive fishes, and the fisherman on the
      shore with his casting net, are minutely represented. As to the
      Hesiodic images themselves, the leading remark is, that they catch
      at beauty by ornament, and at sublimity by exaggeration; and upon
      the untenable supposition of the genuineness of this poem, there is
      this curious peculiarity, that, in the description of scenes of
      rustic peace, the superiority of Homer is decisive--while in those of
      war and tumult it may be thought, perhaps, that the Hesiodic poet
      has more than once the advantage."

  258 "This legend is one of the most pregnant and characteristic in the
      Grecian Mythology; it explains, according to the religious ideas
      familiar to the old epic poets, both the distinguishing attributes
      and the endless toil and endurances of Heracles, the most renowned
      subjugator of all the semi-divine personages worshipped by the
      Hellenes,--a being of irresistible force, and especially beloved by
      Zeus, yet condemned constantly to labour for others and to obey the
      commands of a worthless and cowardly persecutor. His recompense is
      reserved to the close of his career, when his afflicting trials are
      brought to a close: he is then admitted to the godhead, and receives
      in marriage Hebe."--Grote, vol. i. p. 128.

  259 --_Ambrosia._

          "The blue-eyed maid,
        In ev'ry breast new vigour to infuse.
        Brings nectar temper'd with ambrosial dews."

                                          Merrick's Tryphiodorus, vi. 249.

  260 "Hell is naked before him, and destruction hath no covering. He
      stretcheth out the north over the empty place, and hangeth the earth
      upon nothing. He bindeth up the waters in his thick clouds; and the
      cloud is not rent under them." Job xxvi. 6-8.

          261 "Swift from his throne the infernal monarch ran,
        All pale and trembling, lest the race of man,
        Slain by Jove's wrath, and led by Hermes' rod,
        Should fill (a countless throng!) his dark abode."

                                     Merrick's Tryphiodorus, vi. 769, sqq.

  262 These words seem to imply the old belief, that the Fates might be
      delayed, but never wholly set aside.

  263 It was anciently believed that it was dangerous, if not fatal, to
      behold a deity. See Exod. xxxiii. 20; Judg. xiii. 22.

          264 "Ere Ilium and the Trojan tow'rs arose,
        In humble vales they built their soft abodes."

                                                Dryden's Virgil, iii. 150.

  265 --_Along the level seas._ Compare Virgil's description of Camilla,
      who

        "Outstripp'd the winds in speed upon the plain,
        Flew o'er the field, nor hurt the bearded grain:
        She swept the seas, and, as she skimm'd along,
        Her flying feet unbathed on billows hung."

                                                        Dryden, vii. 1100.

  266 --_The future father._ "Ćneas and Antenor stand distinguished from
      the other Trojans by a dissatisfaction with Priam, and a sympathy
      with the Greeks, which is by Sophocles and others construed as
      treacherous collusion,--a suspicion indirectly glanced at, though
      emphatically repelled, in the Ćneas of Virgil."--Grote, i. p. 427.

  267 Neptune thus recounts his services to Ćneas:

        "When your Ćneas fought, but fought with odds
        Of force unequal, and unequal gods:
        I spread a cloud before the victor's sight,
        Sustain'd the vanquish'd, and secured his flight--
        Even then secured him, when I sought with joy
        The vow'd destruction of ungrateful Troy."

                                                 Dryden's Virgil, v. 1058.

  268 --_On Polydore._ Euripides, Virgil, and others, relate that Polydore
      was sent into Thrace, to the house of Polymestor, for protection,
      being the youngest of Priam's sons, and that he was treacherously
      murdered by his host for the sake of the treasure sent with him.

  269 "Perhaps the boldest excursion of Homer into this region of poetical
      fancy is the collision into which, in the twenty-first of the Iliad,
      he has brought the river god Scamander, first with Achilles, and
      afterwards with Vulcan, when summoned by Juno to the hero's aid. The
      overwhelming fury of the stream finds the natural interpretation in
      the character of the mountain torrents of Greece and Asia Minor.
      Their wide, shingly beds are in summer comparatively dry, so as to
      be easily forded by the foot passenger. But a thunder-shower in the
      mountains, unobserved perhaps by the traveller on the plain, may
      suddenly immerse him in the flood of a mighty river. The rescue of
      Achilles by the fiery arms of Vulcan scarcely admits of the same
      ready explanation from physical causes. Yet the subsiding of the
      flood at the critical moment when the hero's destruction appeared
      imminent, might, by a slight extension of the figurative parallel,
      be ascribed to a god symbolic of the influences opposed to all
      atmospheric moisture."--Mure, vol. i. p. 480, sq.

  270 Wood has observed, that "the circumstance of a falling tree, which
      is described as reaching from one of its banks to the other, affords
      a very just idea of the breadth of the Scamander."

  271 --_Ignominious._ Drowning, as compared with a death in the field of
      battle, was considered utterly disgraceful.

  272 --_Beneath a caldron._

        "So, when with crackling flames a caldron fries,
        The bubbling waters from the bottom rise.
        Above the brims they force their fiery way;
        Black vapours climb aloft, and cloud the day."

                                                Dryden's Virgil, vii. 644.

  273 "This tale of the temporary servitude of particular gods, by order
      of Jove, as a punishment for misbehaviour, recurs not unfrequently
      among the incidents of the Mythical world."--Grote, vol. i. p. 156.

  274 --_Not half so dreadful._

          "On the other side,
        Incensed with indignation, Satan stood
        Unterrified, and like a comet burn'd,
        That fires the length of Ophiuchus huge
        In the arctic sky, and from his horrid hair
        Shakes pestilence and war."

                                                 --Paradise Lost," xi. 708.

  275 "And thus his own undaunted mind explores."--"Paradise Lost," vi.
      113.

  276 The example of Nausicaa, in the Odyssey, proves that the duties of
      the laundry were not thought derogatory, even from the dignity of a
      princess, in the heroic times.

  277 --_Hesper shines with keener light._

        "Fairest of stars, last in the train of night,
        If better thou belong not to the dawn."

                                                  "Paradise Lost," v. 166.

  278 Such was his fate. After chasing the Trojans into the town, he was
      slain by an arrow from the quiver of Paris, directed under the
      unerring auspices of Apollo. The greatest efforts were made by the
      Trojans to possess themselves of the body, which was however rescued
      and borne off to the Grecian camp by the valour of Ajax and Ulysses.
      Thetis stole away the body, just as the Greeks were about to burn it
      with funeral honours, and conveyed it away to a renewed life of
      immortality in the isle of Leuke in the Euxine.

  279 --_Astyanax,_ i.e. the _city-king_ or guardian. It is amusing that
      Plato, who often finds fault with Homer without reason, should have
      copied this twaddling etymology into his Cratylus.

  280 This book has been closely imitated by Virgil in his fifth book, but
      it is almost useless to attempt a selection of passages for
      comparison.

  281 --_Thrice in order led._ This was a frequent rite at funerals. The
      Romans had the same custom, which they called _decursio._ Plutarch
      states that Alexander, in after times, renewed these same honours to
      the memory of Achilles himself.

  282 --_And swore._ Literally, and called Orcus, the god of oaths, to
      witness. See Buttmann, Lexilog, p. 436.

          283 "O, long expected by thy friends! from whence
        Art thou so late return'd for our defence?
        Do we behold thee, wearied as we are
        With length of labours, and with, toils of war?
        After so many funerals of thy own,
        Art thou restored to thy declining town?
        But say, what wounds are these? what new disgrace
        Deforms the manly features of thy face?"

                                                          Dryden, xi. 369.

  284 --_Like a thin smoke._ Virgil, Georg. iv. 72.

        "In vain I reach my feeble hands to join
        In sweet embraces--ah! no longer thine!
        She said, and from his eyes the fleeting fair
        Retired, like subtle smoke dissolved in air."

                                                                   Dryden.

  285 So Milton:--

          "So eagerly the fiend
        O'er bog, o'er steep, through strait, rough, dense, or rare,
        With head, hands, wings, or feet pursues his way,
        And swims, or sinks, or wades, or creeps, or flies."

                                                 "Paradise Lost," ii. 948.

          286 "An ancient forest, for the work design'd
        (The shady covert of the savage kind).
        The Trojans found: the sounding axe is placed:
        Firs, pines, and pitch-trees, and the tow'ring pride
        Of forest ashes, feel the fatal stroke,
        And piercing wedges cleave the stubborn oak.
        High trunks of trees, fell'd from the steepy crown
        Of the bare mountains, roll with ruin down."

                                                 Dryden's Virgil, vi. 261.

  287 --_He vowed._ This was a very ancient custom.

  288 The height of the tomb or pile was a great proof of the dignity of
      the deceased, and the honour in which he was held.

  289 On the prevalence of this cruel custom amongst the northern nations,
      see Mallet, p. 213.

  290 --_And calls the spirit._ Such was the custom anciently, even at the
      Roman funerals.

        "Hail, O ye holy manes! hail again,
        Paternal ashes, now revived in vain."

                                                  Dryden's Virgil, v. 106.

  291 Virgil, by making the boaster vanquished, has drawn a better moral
      from this episode than Homer. The following lines deserve
      comparison:--

        "The haughty Dares in the lists appears:
        Walking he strides, his head erected bears:
        His nervous arms the weighty gauntlet wield,
        And loud applauses echo through the field.
        *          *          *          *
        Such Dares was, and such he strode along,
        And drew the wonder of the gazing throng
        His brawny breast and ample chest he shows;
        His lifted arms around his head he throws,
        And deals in whistling air his empty blows.
        His match is sought, but, through the trembling band,
        No one dares answer to the proud demand.
        Presuming of his force, with sparkling eyes,
        Already he devours the promised prize.
        *          *          *          *
        If none my matchless valour dares oppose,
        How long shall Dares wait his dastard foes?"

                                             Dryden's Virgil, v. 486, seq.

          292 "The gauntlet-fight thus ended, from the shore
        His faithful friends unhappy Dares bore:
        His mouth and nostrils pour'd a purple flood,
        And pounded teeth came rushing with his blood."

                                                  Dryden's Virgil, v. 623.

  293 "Troilus is only once named in the Iliad; he was mentioned also in
      the Cypriad but his youth, beauty, and untimely end made him an
      object of great interest with the subsequent poets."--Grote, i, p.
      399.

  294 Milton has rivalled this passage describing the descent of Gabriel,
      "Paradise Lost," bk. v. 266, seq.

          "Down thither prone in flight
        He speeds, and through the vast ethereal sky
        Sails between worlds and worlds, with steady wing,
        Now on the polar winds, then with quick fan
        Winnows the buxom air. * * * *
        *           *               *             *
        At once on th' eastern cliff of Paradise
        He lights, and to his proper shape returns
        A seraph wing'd. * * * *
          Like Maia's son he stood,
        And shook his plumes, that heavenly fragrance fill'd
        The circuit wide."

      Virgil, Ćn. iv. 350:--

        "Hermes obeys; with golden pinions binds
        His flying feet, and mounts the western winds:
        And whether o'er the seas or earth he flies,
        With rapid force they bear him down the skies
        But first he grasps within his awful hand
        The mark of sovereign power, his magic wand;
        With this he draws the ghost from hollow graves;
        With this he drives them from the Stygian waves:
        *           *               *             *
        Thus arm'd, the god begins his airy race,
        And drives the racking clouds along the liquid space."

                                                                   Dryden.

  295 In reference to the whole scene that follows, the remarks of
      Coleridge are well worth reading:--

      "By a close study of life, and by a true and natural mode of
      expressing everything, Homer was enabled to venture upon the most
      peculiar and difficult situations, and to extricate himself from
      them with the completest success. The whole scene between Achilles
      and Priam, when the latter comes to the Greek camp for the purpose
      of redeeming the body of Hector, is at once the most profoundly
      skilful, and yet the simplest and most affecting passage in the
      Iliad. Quinctilian has taken notice of the following speech of
      Priam, the rhetorical artifice of which is so transcendent, that if
      genius did not often, especially in oratory, unconsciously fulfil
      the most subtle precepts of criticism, we might be induced, on this
      account alone, to consider the last book of the Iliad as what is
      called spurious, in other words, of later date than the rest of the
      poem. Observe the exquisite taste of Priam in occupying the mind of
      Achilles, from the outset, with the image of his father; in
      gradually introducing the parallel of his own situation; and,
      lastly, mentioning Hector's name when he perceives that the hero is
      softened, and then only in such a manner as to flatter the pride of
      the conqueror. The ego d'eleeinoteros per, and the apusato aecha
      geronta, are not exactly like the tone of the earlier parts of the
      Iliad. They are almost too fine and pathetic. The whole passage
      defies translation, for there is that about the Greek which has no
      name, but which is of so fine and ethereal a subtlety that it can
      only be felt in the original, and is lost in an attempt to transfuse
      it into another language."--Coleridge, p. 195.

  296 "Achilles' ferocious treatment of the corpse of Hector cannot but
      offend as referred to the modern standard of humanity. The heroic
      age, however, must be judged by its own moral laws. Retributive
      vengeance on the dead, as well as the living, was a duty inculcated
      by the religion of those barbarous times which not only taught that
      evil inflicted on the author of evil was a solace to the injured
      man; but made the welfare of the soul after death dependent on the
      fate of the body from which it had separated. Hence a denial of the
      rites essential to the soul's admission into the more favoured
      regions of the lower world was a cruel punishment to the wanderer on
      the dreary shores of the infernal river. The complaint of the ghost
      of Patroclus to Achilles, of but a brief postponement of his own
      obsequies, shows how efficacious their refusal to the remains of his
      destroyer must have been in satiating the thirst of revenge, which,
      even after death, was supposed to torment the dwellers in Hades.
      Hence before yielding up the body of Hector to Priam, Achilles asks
      pardon of Patroclus for even this partial cession of his just rights
      of retribution."--Mure, vol. i. 289.

  297 Such was the fate of Astyanax, when Troy was taken.

        "Here, from the tow'r by stern Ulysses thrown,
        Andromache bewail'd her infant son."

                                           Merrick's Tryphiodorus, v. 675.

  298 The following observations of Coleridge furnish a most gallant and
      interesting view of Helen's character--

      "Few things are more interesting than to observe how the same hand
      that has given us the fury and inconsistency of Achilles, gives us
      also the consummate elegance and tenderness of Helen. She is through
      the Iliad a genuine lady, graceful in motion and speech, noble in
      her associations, full of remorse for a fault for which higher
      powers seem responsible, yet grateful and affectionate towards those
      with whom that fault had committed her. I have always thought the
      following speech in which Helen laments Hector, and hints at her own
      invidious and unprotected situation in Troy, as almost the sweetest
      passage in the poem. It is another striking instance of that
      refinement of feeling and softness of tone which so generally
      distinguish the last book of the Iliad from the rest."--Classic
      Poets, p. 198, seq.

  299 "And here we part with Achilles at the moment best calculated to
      exalt and purify our impression of his character. We had accompanied
      him through the effervescence, undulations, and final subsidence of
      his stormy passions. We now leave him in repose and under the full
      influence of the more amiable affections, while our admiration of
      his great qualities is chastened by the reflection that, within a
      few short days the mighty being in whom they were united was himself
      to be suddenly cut off in the full vigour of their exercise.

      The frequent and touching allusions, interspersed throughout the
      Iliad, to the speedy termination of its hero's course, and the moral
      on the vanity of human life which they indicate, are among the
      finest evidences of the spirit of ethic unity by which the whole
      framework of the poem is united."--Mure, vol. i. p 201.

  300 Cowper says,--"I cannot take my leave of this noble poem without
      expressing how much I am struck with the plain conclusion of it. It
      is like the exit of a great man out of company, whom he has
      entertained magnificently; neither pompous nor familiar; not
      contemptuous, yet without much ceremony." Coleridge, p. 227,
      considers the termination of "Paradise Lost" somewhat similar.

